Washington statutes.
RCW 18.52.040

Board of nursing home administrators—Created—Membership.

(1) The state board of nursing home administrators shall consist of eleven members appointed by the governor. Six members shall be persons licensed under this chapter who have at least four years actual experience in the administration of a licensed nursing home in this state. At least one, but not more than two, of the six administrator members shall be an administrator of an assisted living facility or a continuing care retirement community.

(2) Three members shall be representatives of one or more of the following:

(a) Licensed health care professionals providing medical or nursing services in nursing homes who are privately or self-employed;

(b) Faculty or administrators of educational institutions who have special knowledge of health care education, long-term care, or care of the aged or elderly; or

(c) Persons currently employed in areas related to the long-term care field including, but not limited to, pharmacy, home health, adult family homes, or therapy services.

(3) Two members shall be members of the health care consuming public who are residents of nursing homes or family members of nursing home residents or persons eligible for medicare. No member who is a nonadministrator representative shall have any direct or family financial interest in nursing homes while serving as a member of the board. The governor shall consult with and seek the recommendations of the appropriate statewide business and professional organizations and societies primarily concerned with long-term health care facilities in the course of considering his or her appointments to the board.

[ 2022 c 240 s 3; 2011 c 336 s 488; 1992 c 53 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 97 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 57 s 4.]